Utah statutes.
76-10-305.   Different dates on containers of explosives prohibited -- Reuse of containers prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person or persons, partnership, or corporation to have two or more different dates on any box or package containing giant, hercules, atlas, or venture, or any other high explosive containing nitroglycerin. It shall further be unlawful to use any box, package, or wrapper formerly used by any other person or persons, partnership, or corporation in the packing of such giant, hercules, atlas, venture, or other high explosive containing nitroglycerin, and the name and date on the box or package shall be the same as on the wrapper containing the giant, hercules, atlas, venture, or other explosive containing nitroglycerin.

